New Jersey, session 221, A4671.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. (New section) A member of the Legislature serving in the General Assembly shall officially be referred to as an Assembly Member.  The legislator shall be addressed as Assembly Member followed by the legislators last name. 2. Section 11 of P.L.1967, c.271 (C.18A:75-11) is amended to read as follows: 11. New Jersey shall be represented on the commission established by Article III  of the compact by the governor, four members appointed by the governor from  among the citizens of this state who will serve at the pleasure of the governor, and one senator to be named by the president of the senate and one [assemblyman] assembly member to be named by the speaker of the general assembly.  Legislative members of the commission shall be appointed for terms coincident with the terms for which they were elected to the senate or general assembly.  The New Jersey members will serve without compensation but shall be entitled to be reimbursed for all necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.  Vacancies in the membership shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments were made. (cf: P.L.1967, c.271, s.11) 3. N.J.S.18A:73-22 is amended to read as follows: 18A:73-22.  There is hereby established in the Department of State, a division called the New Jersey Historical Commission to be composed of 17 members as follows: (a)  The Secretary of State, the State Librarian and the Chief of the Office of New Jersey Heritage in the Department of Environmental Protection, or their designees, who shall serve ex officio; and (b)  Ten citizens of the State to be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate, all of whom shall be chosen by reason of their expertise in New Jersey history and qualified by academic achievement or professional affiliation, who shall serve for terms of three years and until the appointment and qualification of their successors except that of the members first appointed two shall be appointed for terms of one year, two for terms of two years and two for terms of three years.  Of the four members first appointed pursuant to this amendatory act, one shall be appointed for a term of one year, one shall be appointed for a term of two years and two shall be appointed for a term of three years.  Public members of the commission shall be selected so as to provide a balanced representation of the various geographic regions of the State. (c)  Two members of the Senate to be appointed by the President thereof, and two members of the General Assembly to be appointed by the Speaker thereof.  No more than one of the Senate and Assembly members shall be members of the same political party.  Anyone appointed pursuant to this subsection shall serve as a member of the commission until the expiration of his term as Senator or [Assemblyman] Assembly Member, as the case may be, during which [he] the Senator or Assembly Member  was appointed. (cf: P.L.1990, c.106, s.1) 4. Section 4 of P.L.1963, c.117 (C.52:14A-4) is amended to read as follows: 4. In the event that the Governor, for any reason, is not able to exercise and discharge the functions, powers and duties of [his] the Governors office, or is unavailable, the functions, powers and duties of such office shall devolve in the manner provided in Article V, Section 1 of the Constitution of the State of New  Jersey.  In the event that the persons upon whom such functions, powers and  duties devolve, under such provisions of the Constitution, are not able to  exercise the same or are unavailable, then such functions, powers and duties  shall devolve upon the Attorney General, for the time being;  and in the event  that [he] the Attorney General is unable to exercise the powers and duties of such office or is  unavailable, then upon the [State Highway Commissioner] the Commissioner of the New Jersey Department of Transportation, for the time being;  and  in the event that [he] the commissioner is unable to exercise the powers and duties of such office  or is unavailable, then upon such person as the Legislature by majority vote of the total number of available legislators and emergency interim successors, exercising the powers and discharging the duties of legislators not available, in both Houses may designate.  Any such official or other person upon whom the powers and duties of the Governor have developed shall exercise the same until a new Governor is elected and qualified.  No deputy or emergency interim successor to the aforementioned offices, including such successor to any Senator or [Assemblyman] Assembly Member may serve as Governor. (cf: P.L.1963, c.117, s.4) 5.  This act shall take effect immediately.